District of Columbia statutes.
34-1116

Commission to keep informed of new construction; construction account.

The Commission shall keep itself informed of all new construction, extensions, and additions to the property of all public utilities, and shall prescribe the necessary forms, regulations, and instructions to the officers and employees of all public utilities for the keeping of construction accounts, which shall clearly distinguish all operating expenses and new construction.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 980, ch. 150, § 8, par. 17
Commission’s authority to order improvements and repairs, see § 34-808.
Public Service Commission, creation, powers and duties, see § 34-802.
1981 Ed., § 43-516.
1973 Ed., § 43-316.